New York, session 2025-2026, A2214.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. No later than June 30, 2025, the state athletic commission 2 shall promulgate regulations governing the conduct of authorized 3 combined professional and amateur mixed martial arts events. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05014-01-5